Vermont, session 2025-2026, S287.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTERSTATE 22A; STUDY COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Interstate 22A Limited Access Highway
Study Committee to examine the potential for constructing a new limited
access highway to connect the population centers of central-west and
northwest Vermont to Interstate 87 and replace Vermont Route 22A as the
primary route from Burlington to Interstate 87.
VT LEG #380263 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.287
2026 Page 2 of 4
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Transportation or designee;
(2) two current members of the House, not from the same political party,
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) two current members of the Senate, not from the same political
party, appointed by the Committee on Committees;
(4) the Mayor of Burlington or designee;
(5) the Chair of the South Burlington City Council or designee;
(6) the Mayor of Vergennes or designee;
(7) the Chair of the Middlebury Selectboard or designee;
(8) the Mayor of Rutland or designee;
(9) a member appointed by the Chittenden County Regional Planning
Commission;
(10) a member appointed by the Addison County Regional Planning
Commission; and
(11) a member appointed by the Rutland Regional Planning
Commission.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall examine the potential to
construct a limited access highway to connect the population centers of central-
west and northwest Vermont to Interstate 87 and replace Vermont Route 22A
VT LEG #380263 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.287
2026 Page 3 of 4
as the primary route from Burlington to Interstate 87, including the following
issues:
(1) the current and projected usage of Vermont Route 22A;
(2) the potential route for a new limited access highway to connect
Burlington to Interstate 87;
(3) the projected cost to construct a new highway connection between
Burlington and Interstate 87;
(4) potential funding mechanisms for a new highway, including the
utilization of tolls through integration into the E-ZPass Group or through the
utilization of a public-private partnership;
(5) the projected economic impact of a new highway connection
between Burlington and Interstate 87 on Vermont and on the population
centers of central-west and northwest Vermont; and
(6) other projected impacts on Vermont and communities located along
U.S. Route 7 in Vermont of a new highway connection between U.S. Route 7
and Interstate 87.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Agency of Transportation.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the General Assembly with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action.
VT LEG #380263 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.287
2026 Page 4 of 4
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Transportation shall call the first meeting of the
Committee to occur on or before September 1, 2026.
(2) The Secretary of Transportation or designee shall be the Chair.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on February 15, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Committee who
are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings shall be entitled
to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be
made from monies appropriated to the Agency of Transportation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380263 v.3